Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2354.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1216 of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 1216. Evaluation of Applications for Certification.--* * *(e) The following shall apply:(1) No later than December 31, 2025, the Department of Education shall establish and implement a policy to provide a one-time fee waiver for an eligible applicant to retake an assessment required under 22 Pa. Code § 49.18.(2) The Department of Education shall have the following duties:1234567891011121314151617181920 (i) Publish the policy under paragraph (1) on its publicly accessible Internet website.(ii) Distribute the policy under paragraph (1) to all advanced preparation programs, alternative program providers and preparing institutions.(3) For the purposes of this subsection:(i) "Advanced preparation program" shall have the meaning given in 22 Pa. Code § 354.1 (relating to definitions).(ii) "Alternative program provider" shall have the meaning given in 22 Pa. Code § 49.1.(iii) "Assessment" shall include the assessment of basic skills, professional knowledge and practice or subject matter knowledge as defined in 22 Pa. Code § 49.1.(iv) "Eligible applicant" shall mean an individual who meets all of the following criteria:(A) Has taken an assessment under 22 Pa. Code § 49.18 and failed to achieve a passing score by a margin of three or fewer scaled score points.(B) Has taken the assessment no more than once prior to requesting the fee waiver under this subsection.(C) Registers to retake the same assessment within one year of the date the initial assessment score was released.(v) "Preparing institution" shall have the meaning given in 22 Pa. Code § 354.1.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2354PN3123 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425